Hawaii statutes.
§476-16 Waiver of illegal act; collection.
No provision in a credit sale contract by which the buyer waives any of the
requirements of this chapter or any right of action against the seller or
holder of the contract, or other person acting on the seller's or holder's
behalf, for any illegal act committed in the collection of payments under the
contract or in the repossession of the goods shall be enforceable. [L 1961, c
102, pt of §1; Supp, §201A-14; HRS §476-15; am and ren L 1984, c 86, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next